Idaho, session 2026, H0870.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Office of Information Technology Ser-
vices the following amounts to be expended for the designated expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2026, through June 30,
2027:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
FROM:
General
Fund $1,316,700 $1,376,700 $2,693,400
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $6,974,200 524,800 34,200 7,533,200
Federal Grant
Fund 253,500 200,900 0 454,400
TOTAL $7,227,700 $2,042,400 $1,410,900 $10,681,000
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to any other authorization
provided by law, the full-time equivalent position authorization provided
to the Office of Information Technology Services is hereby increased by
fifty-nine and five-tenths (59.50) for the period July 1, 2026, through June
30, 2027.
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER FOR PERSONNEL COSTS. There is hereby appro-
priated and the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $458,700 from
the General Fund to the Administration and Accounting Services Fund on July


1, 2026, or as soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 4. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chapter
321, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Office of Information Technology Services
$200,000 for operating expenditures from the General Fund for the period of
July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of purchasing building
furnishings at the Chinden Campus.
SECTION 5. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 321, Laws of 2025, and any other appropriation provided for by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Office of Information Technology Services the
following amounts to be expended for the designated expense classes from the
Federal Grant Fund for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the
purpose of E-CORE Federal Grant program:
FOR:
Personnel Costs $23,000
Operating Expenditures 33,200
TOTAL $56,200
SECTION 6. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In addition to the authorization pro-
vided in Section 2, Chapter 321, Laws of 2025, the full-time equivalent
position authorization provided to the Office of Information Technology
Services is hereby increased by five-tenths (0.50) for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of E-CORE Federal Grant program.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Sections 4 through 6 this act shall be in full force and
effect on and after passage and approval, and Sections 1 through 3 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2026.